Washington statutes.
RCW 18.76.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the department of health.

(2) "Poison information center medical director" means a person who: (a) Is licensed to practice medicine and surgery under chapter 18.71 RCW or osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW; (b) is certified by the secretary under standards adopted under RCW 18.76.050; and (c) provides services enumerated under RCW 18.76.030, and is responsible for supervision of poison information specialists.

(3) "Poison information specialist" means a person who provides services enumerated under RCW 18.76.030 under the supervision of a poison information center medical director and is certified by the secretary under standards adopted under RCW 18.76.050.

(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

[ 1996 c 178 s 7; 1991 c 3 s 184; 1987 c 214 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.